Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201620-501
Racial profiling;
legislative intent.

Racial profiling is a practice
that presents a great danger to the fundamental principles of a democratic
society. It is abhorrent and cannot be tolerated. An individual who has been detained or whose vehicle has been
stopped by the police for no reason other than the color of his
or her skin or his or her apparent nationality
or ethnicity is the victim of a discriminatory practice.

Laws 2001, LB 593, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB99, § 1.